Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,272
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation; inspection; denial of permit; hearing.

Before approving an application for a permit pursuant to section 81-2,270, the regulatory authority shall inspect the food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation to determine whether the applicant qualifies to hold a permit pursuant to subsection (1) of section 81-2,273. An applicant found to qualify to hold a permit pursuant to such subsection shall be issued a permit. An applicant who does not receive a permit shall be afforded the opportunity of a hearing to present evidence that the applicant is qualified to hold a permit pursuant to such subsection and should be issued a permit. All such hearings shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 26.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.